hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Rekreacija na otvorenom > Plovidba i vodeni sportovi: Plovljenje čamcem i rafting; Odjeća za plovidbu i vodene sportove; Zaštitna oprema za plovidbu i vodene sportove; Peraje za bodyboard; Ronjenje i ronjenje s disalicom; Plovci i dodaci; Kitesurfing; Dijelovi i dodaci za pedaline; Surfanje; Plivanje; Vučni vodeni sportovi; Stalci za pohranu plovila; Windfoiling; Jedrenje na dasci; Wingfoiling
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Giải trí ngoài trời > Chèo thuyền và thể thao dưới nước: Chèo thuyển & thả bè; Trang phục chèo thuyền và thể thao dưới nước; Đồ bảo hộ chèo thuyền và thể thao dưới nước; Chân vịt lướt ván nằm; Lặn & Lặn ống thở; Phao nổi và phụ kiện; Lướt ván diều; Phụ kiện và bộ phận thuyền đạp nước; Lướt sóng; Bơi; Lướt ván có thuyền kéo; Giá cất tàu thuyền; Lướt ván gió; Lướt ván buồm; Lướt ván cánh
ko: 스포츠용품 > 야외 레크레이션 > 보트 놀이/수상 스포츠: 보트/래프트; 보트 놀이/수상 스포츠 의류; 보트 타기 및 수상 스포츠 보호 장비; 바디보드 핀; 다이빙/스노클링; 플로트 튜브 및 액세서리; 카이트서핑; 페달 보트 부품 및 액세서리; 서핑; 수영; 견인식 수상 스포츠; 선박 보관 선반; 윈드포일링; 윈드서핑; 윙포일링
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Actividades al aire libre > Deportes acuáticos y navegación deportiva: Navegación y rafting; Equipamiento para deportes acuáticos y navegación deportiva; Equipos de protección para deportes náuticos; Aletas para bodyboard; Buceo y buceo con esnórquel; Tubos flotadores y accesorios; Kitesurf; Piezas y accesorios para botes a pedal; Surf; Natación; Deportes acuáticos remolcados; Soportes de almacenaje para embarcaciones; Windfoiling; Windsurf; Wingfoiling
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friluftsliv > Båt og vannsport: Båt og rafting; Båt- og vannsportklær; Beskyttelsesutstyr for båt- og vannsport; Svømmeføtter for bodyboard; Dykking og snorkling; Flyteringer og tilbehør; Kitesurfing; Deler og tilbehør til tråkkebåt; Surfing; Svømming; Trukket vannsport; Lagringsstativer for vannfartøyer; Windfoiling; Windsurfing; Wingfoiling
hu: Sportszerek > Szabadtéri kikapcsolódás > Csónakázás és vízi sportok: Csónakázás és rafting; Csónakázó és vízisport-ruházat; Védőfelszerelés csónakázáshoz és vízi sportokhoz; Bodyboard-uszonyok; Búvárkodás és sznorkelezés; Belly boatok és kiegészítők; Sárkányszörfözés; Vízibicikli-alkatrészek és -kiegészítők; Szörfözés; Úszás; Vontatott vízi sportok; Vízijárműtároló állványok; Szélszörfözés; Szörfvitorlázás; Szárnyszörfözés
sv: Sportartiklar > Utomhusaktiviteter > Båt- och vattensporter: Båtsport; Kläder för båt- och vattensporter; Skyddsutrustning för båtliv och vattensport; Bodyboardfenor; Sportdykning och snorkling; Flytringar och tillbehör; Kitesurfning; Delar och tillbehör för trampbåtar; Surfing; Simning; Vattensporter med draglina; Förvaringsställningar för vattenfarkoster; Windfoiling; Vindsurfing; Wingfoiling
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Exteriérové rekreakčné športy > Člnkovanie a vodné športy: Člnkovanie a rafting; Oblečenie na člnkovanie a vodné športy; Ochranné vybavenie na člnkovanie a vodné športy; Plutvy na bodyboard; Potápanie a šnorchlovanie; Plavákové duše a príslušenstvo; Kitesurfing; Súčiastky a príslušenstvo pre vodné bicykle; Surfovanie; Plávanie; Vlečné vodné športy; Stojany na skladovanie plavidiel; Windfoiling; Windsurfing; Wingfoiling
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Poilsis lauke > Plaukiojimas valtimis ir vandens sportas: Plaukimas valtimis ir plaustais; Apranga plaukimui valtimis ir vandens sportui; Plaukimo valtimis ir vandens sporto apsauginė įranga; Gulimosios banglentės pelekai; Nardymas su akvalangu ir vamzdeliu; Plūduriavimo vamzdžiai ir priedai; Jėgos aitvarų sportas; Vandens dviračių dalys ir priedai; Banglenčių sportas; Plaukimas; Velkamasis vandens sportas; Vandens transporto priemonių stelažai; Orlenčių sportas; Burlenčių sportas; Aitvaravimas
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Ulkoharrasteet > Veneily ja vesiurheilu: Veneily ja koskenlasku; Veneily- ja vesiurheiluvaatetus; Veneilyn ja vesiurheilun suojavarusteet; Bodyboarding-räpylät; Sukellus ja snorklaus; Kelluntarenkaat ja tarvikkeet; Leijalautailu; Polkuveneiden osat ja lisävarusteet; Surffaus; Uinti; Vesiurheilulajit veneen perässä; Veneiden säilytystelineet; Siipilautailu; Purjelautailu; Foilpurjelautailu
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividades recreativas no exterior > Desportos náuticos e aquáticos: Desportos náuticos e rafting; Vestuário para desportos náuticos e aquáticos; Equipamento de proteção para passeios de barco e desportos aquáticos; Barbatanas de bodyboard; Mergulho e snorkeling; Boias de pesca e acessórios; Kitesurf; Peças e acessórios para barcos a pedais; Surfe; Natação; Desportos aquáticos de reboque; Suportes de armazenamento de embarcações; Windfoil; Windsurf; Wingfoil
fr: Équipements sportifs > Loisirs de plein air > Plaisance et sports nautiques: Plaisance et rafting; Équipement de plaisance et sports nautiques; Équipement de protection pour la navigation et les sports nautiques; Palmes de bodyboard; Plongée et snorkeling; Float tubes et accessoires; Kitesurf; Pièces et accessoires de pédalos; Surf; Natation; Sports nautiques tractés; Racks de stockage de bateaux; Windfoil; Windsurf; Wingfoil
da: Sportsartikler > Friluftsliv > Sejling og vandsport: Sejlads og rafting; Sejlertøj og tøj til vandsport; Beskyttelsesudstyr til sejl- og vandsport; Svømmefødder til bodyboards; Dykning og snorkeldykning; Flyderinge og tilbehør; Kitesurfing; Dele og tilbehør til vandcykler; Surfing; Svømning; Vandsport, hvor man trækkes; Opbevaring til fartøjer; Windfoiling; Windsurfing; Wingsurfing
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Atividades ao ar livre > Canoagem e esportes aquáticos: Navegação e rafting; Roupas de canoagem e esportes aquáticos; Equipamento de proteção para canoagem e esportes aquáticos; Nadadeiras para bodyboard; Mergulho e snorkeling; Boias de flutuação e acessórios; Kitesurf; Peças e acessórios para pedalinhos; Surfe; Natação; Esportes aquáticos rebocados; Suporte para armazenamento de jet-skis; Windfoiling; Windsurfe; Wingfoiling
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Recreere în aer liber > Plimbări cu barca și sporturi nautice: Plimbări cu barca și rafting; Echipamente pentru plimbări cu barca și sporturi nautice; Echipamente de protecție pentru plimbări cu barca și sporturi nautice; Labe de înot pentru bodyboarding; Scufundări și snorkeling; Tuburi de plutire și accesorii; Kitesurfing; Piese și accesorii pentru hidrobiciclete; Surfing; Înot; Sporturi nautice cu remorcare; Suporturi de depozitare pentru ambarcațiuni; Windfoiling; Windsurfing; Wingfoiling
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 户外休闲 > 划船/水上运动: 赛艇用品; 划船/水上运动服饰; 划船和水上运动防护装备; 趴板脚蹼; 潜水用品; 浮圈与配件; 风筝冲浪; 脚踏船零件和配件; 冲浪用品; 游泳用品; 滑水用品; 船舶存放架; 风帆冲浪; 帆板运动; 风翼冲浪
en: Sporting Goods > Outdoor Recreation > Boating & Water Sports: Boating & Rafting; Boating & Water Sport Apparel; Boating & Water Sport Protective Gear; Bodyboard Fins; Diving & Snorkeling; Float Tubes & Accessories; Kitesurfing; Pedal Boat Parts & Accessories; Surfing; Swimming; Towed Water Sports; Watercraft Storage Racks; Windfoiling; Windsurfing; Wingfoiling
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > สันทนาการกลางแจ้ง > กีฬาทางเรือและทางน้ำ: การล่องเรือและแพ; เสื้อผ้าสำหรับกีฬาทางเรือและทางน้ำ; อุปกรณ์ป้องกันสำหรับพายเรือและกีฬาทางน้ำ; ตีนกบสำหรับบอดี้บอร์ด; การดำน้ำและการดำน้ำตื้น; ห่วงยางและอุปกรณ์เสริม; ไคท์เซิร์ฟ; ชิ้นส่วนและอุปกรณ์เสริมสำหรับเรือถีบ; การเล่นกระดานโต้คลื่น; ว่ายน้ำ; กีฬาทางน้ำแบบลาก; ชั้นจัดเก็บยานพาหนะที่แล่นบนหรือในน้ำ; วินด์ฟอยล์; วินเซิร์ฟ; วิงฟอยล์
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания на открито > Плаване с лодка и водни спортове: Плаване с лодка и рафтинг; Облекло за плаване с лодка и водни спортове; Защитна екипировка за каране на лодка и водни спортове; Плавници за бодиборд; Гмуркане и шнорхелинг; Надуваеми риболовни лодки и аксесоари; Кайтсърфинг; Части и аксесоари за водни колела; Сърфиране; Плуване; Водни спортове с теглене; Стойки за съхранение на плавателни съдове; Уиндфойл; Уиндсърфинг; Уиндфойл
de: Sportartikel > Outdoor-Aktivitäten > Boot- & Wassersport: Bootssport; Boots- & Wassersportkleidung; Schutzausrüstung für Boot- und Wassersport; Bodyboard-Flossen; Tauchen & Schnorcheln; Bellyboote & Zubehör; Kitesurfen; Ersatzteile & Zubehör für Tretboote; Surfen; Schwimmen; Seilgebundene Wassersportarten; Ablagen für Wasserfahrzeuge; Windfoiling; Windsurfen; Wingsurfen
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Rekreacija na prostem > Plovba in vodni športi: Plovba in rafting; Oblačila za plovbo in vodne športe; Zaščitna oprema za plovbo in vodne športe; Plavuti za deske za plovkanje; Potapljanje in snorkljanje; Plavalni obroči in dodatki; Kajtanje; Deli in dodatki za pedalni čoln; Surfanje; Plavanje; Vlečni športi na vodi; Stojala za shranjevanje vodnih plovil; Jadranje s foilom; Jadranje na deski; Foilanje
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 室外休閒 > 水上運動: 划船/泛舟; 水上運動服裝; 划船與水上運動護具; 趴板蛙鞋; 潛水/浮潛; 釣魚浮圈與配件; 風箏衝浪; 腳踏船零件與配件; 衝浪; 游泳; 纜繩滑水; 船艇置放架; 水翼風翼; 風帆衝浪運動; 水翼風翼
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Outdoorové aktivity > Lodě a vodní sporty: Kajaky, kánoe a rafty; Oblečení na lodě a vodní sporty; Ochranné vybavení pro plavbu na lodi a vodní sporty; Ploutve na bodyboarding; Potápění a šnorchlování; Belly boaty a příslušenství; Kitesurfing; Díly a příslušenství pro šlapadla; Surfování; Plavání; Vlečné vodní sporty; Stojany na uskladnění lodí; Windfoiling; Windsurfing; Wingfoiling
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Υπαίθριες δραστηριότητες αναψυχής > Ναυσιπλοΐα & θαλάσσια σπορ: Ναυσιπλοΐα & ράφτινγκ; Ενδύματα για ναυσιπλοΐα και θαλάσσια σπορ; Προστατευτικός εξοπλισμός για σκάφη & θαλάσσια σπορ; Βατραχοπέδιλα bodyboard; Καταδύσεις & κολύμβηση με αναπνευστήρα; Φουσκωτοί πλωτήρες belly boat και αξεσουάρ; Kitesurfing; Εξαρτήματα & αξεσουάρ για θαλάσσια ποδήλατα; Σέρφινγκ; Κολύμβηση; Θαλάσσια σπορ με ρυμούλκηση; Ράφια αποθήκευσης σκαφών; Windfoiling; Ιστιοσανίδα; Wingfoiling
ru: Спортивные товары > Активный отдых на открытом воздухе > Гребля и водные виды спорта: Товары для гребли и рафтинга; Экипировка для гребли и водных видов спорта; Защитное снаряжение для гребных и водных видов спорта; Ласты для бодибординга; Дайвинг и сноркелинг; Плотики для рыбалки и аксессуары; Кайтсерфинг; Детали и аксессуары для водных велосипедов; Серфинг; Плавание; Катание по воде за катером; Кронштейны для хранения лодок и досок; Виндфойлинг; Виндсерфинг; Вингфойлинг
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Açık Hava Etkinlikleri > Kayıkçılık ve Su Sporları: Kayıkçılık ve Rafting; Kayıkçılık ve Su Sporları Kıyafetleri; Teknecilik ve Su Sporları Koruyucu Donanımı; Bodyboard paletleri; Tüplü Dalış ve Şnorkelle Yüzme; Float tube ve aksesuarları; Uçurtma Sörfü; Deniz bisikleti parçaları ve aksesuarları; Sörf; Yüzme; Çekmeli Su Sporları; Su Taşıtı Saklama Rafları; Windfoil; Rüzgar Sörfü; Wingfoil
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Rekreacja na świeżym powietrzu > Żegluga i sporty wodne: Pływanie łodzią i rafting; Odzież żeglarska i do uprawiania sportów wodnych; Stroje ochronne do wodniactwa i sportów wodnych; Płetwy do bodyboardingu; Nurkowanie i snorkeling; Pływadełka i akcesoria; Kitesurfing; Części i akcesoria do rowerów wodnych; Surfing; Pływanie; Sporty wodne holowane; Stojaki na jednostki pływające; Windfoiling; Windsurfing; Wingfoiling
nl: Sportartikelen > Buitenrecreatie > Boten en watersport: Varen en rafting; Boot- en watersportkleding; Beschermende uitrusting voor boten en watersporten; Bodyboardvinnen; Duiken en snorkelen; Bellyboats en accessoires; Kitesurfen; Onderdelen en accessoires voor waterfietsen; Surfen; Zwemmen; Watersporten met motorische aandrijving; Opbergrekken voor vaartuigen; Windfoiling; Windsurfen; Wingfoilen
it: Articoli sportivi > Ricreazione outdoor > Sport acquatici: Nautica e rafting; Attrezzatura per sport acquatici; Attrezzatura protettiva per la nautica e gli sport acquatici; Pinne da bodyboard; Immersioni e snorkeling; Belly boat e accessori; Kitesurf; Componenti e accessori per pedalò; Surf (sport); Nuoto; Sport nautici con traino; Scaffali per lo stoccaggio di natanti; Windfoil; Windsurf; Wingfoil
ja: スポーツ用品 > 屋外レクリエーション > ウォータースポーツ・アクティビティ: カヌー・ラフティング; ウォータースポーツウェア; ボート・ウォータースポーツ用プロテクター; ボディボード用フィン; ダイビング・シュノーケリング; フローター・アクセサリー; カイトサーフィン; ペダルボートパーツ＆アクセサリー; サーフィン; スイミング; トーイングアクティビティ; ボート・水上バイク用収納ラック; ウィンドフォイル; ウィンドサーフィン; ウイングフォイル